lexc/noun/enhumely.lexc
LEXICON Case1mely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounnyadik
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurnyadik;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Plurnyadik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez18§k    Gen;
                            Gen;


LEXICON AddNounat
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possat;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA2§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Noun
ahányadik AddNounnyadik;
akárhányadik AddNounnyadik;
hanyadik AddNounnyadik;
hányadik AddNounnyadik;
lóvés AddNounat;
sehányadik AddNounnyadik;
valahányadik AddNounnyadik;
